Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
TRANSFEREES AND CREDITORS OF MEMBERS

[§428-501] Member's distributional
interest. (a) A member is not a co-owner of, and has no transferable
interest in, property of a limited liability company.

(b) A distributional interest in a limited liability
company is personal property and, subject to sections 428-502 and 428-503, may
be transferred in whole or in part.

(c) An operating agreement may provide that a
distributional interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest
issued by the limited liability company and, subject to section 428-503, may
also provide for the transfer of any interest represented by the certificate.
[L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Where plaintiff was not an owner of the Haina Mill property
nor was plaintiff an owner of any other property or assets of the limited
liability companies, plaintiff lacked standing to pursue certain amended counts
because each claim sought to recover losses by, or other damages to, the
limited liability companies, and the claims did not assert that plaintiff, as
an individual, suffered an injury in fact as a result of defendants' allegedly
wrongful actions. Whether further amendment of certain counts would still be
futile even after plaintiff added allegations regarding harm to plaintiff's
distributional interests, discussed. 23 F. Supp. 3d 1152 (2014).

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next